Louisiana, session 2026, HB980.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1666.5(C) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1666.5. Fireman's Supplemental Pay Board
* * *
C. No person who does not receive state supplemental pay pursuant to R.S.
40:1666.1 shall serve on the board.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2028; if vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on
January 1, 2028, or on the day following such approval by the legislature, whichever is later.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.